Maine, session 132, LD2234.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. P&SL 1977, c. 99, §12, as repealed and replaced by P&SL 2001, c. 21, §5,
is amended to read:
Sec. 12. Debt limit. For accomplishing the purposes of this Act, and for any other
expenses that may be necessary for the carrying out of those purposes, the district, through
its trustees, is authorized to borrow money temporarily and to issue for the money its
negotiable notes; and for the purpose of renewing and refunding the indebtedness created,
of paying any necessary expenses and liabilities incurred under the provisions of this Act,
including organizational and other necessary expenses and liabilities, whether incurred by
the district or the municipality, the district being authorized to reimburse the municipality
for any such expenses incurred by it, and in acquiring properties, paying damages, laying
pipes, mains, aqueducts and conduits, constructing, maintaining and operating a water plant
or system and making renewals, additions, extensions and improvements to the same, and
Page 1 - 132LR3082(02)

to cover interest payments during the period of construction, the district, through its
trustees, is also authorized to issue, from time to time, bonds, notes or other evidences of
indebtedness of the district in one series or in separate series and to make subsequent
renewals of the bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness, the amount or amounts,
not exceeding the sum of $1,500,000 $4,000,000 outstanding at any one time, bearing
interest at such rate or rates, and having such terms and provisions as the trustees determine;
except that, in the case of a vote by the trustees to authorize bonds or notes to pay for the
acquisition of property, for the cost of a water system or part of a water system, for renewal
or additions or for other improvements in the nature of capital costs, the estimated cost of
which, singly or in the aggregate included in any one financing is $30,000 or more, or for
renewing or refunding existing indebtedness, notice of the proposed debt and of the general
purpose or purposes for which it was authorized must be given by the clerk by publication
at least once in a newspaper having a general circulation in the Town of Vinalhaven.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the district, through its trustees,
may issue bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness in amounts exceeding
$1,500,000 $4,000,000 at any one time if a greater debt limit is established by referendum
in accordance with the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 35-A, section 6413. The district may
not have outstanding at any one time bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness in
amounts exceeding any debt limit established by referendum in accordance with Title 35-A,
section 6413.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR3082(02)